Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB14.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 61 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Full-time position" has the same meaning as in KRS 18A.005; and
(b) "Qualifying employee" means an employee of the:
1. Executive branch of state government;
2. Judicial branch of state government; or
3. Legislative branch of state government.
(2) (a) A qualifying employee employed in a full-time position shall be eligible for
up to thirty (30) days of paid maternity leave upon the birth of a child. Any
time designed for paid maternity leave shall be used without deduction of
salary.
(b) If a qualifying employee gives birth to more than one (1) child during a
single pregnancy, the leave for each child shall be taken concurrently, and
treated as one (1) birth.
(3) A qualifying employee shall use the thirty (30) days of paid maternity leave within
one (1) year of a child's birth. Any paid maternity leave not used during the one
(1) year period shall not carry over to the following year and shall not convert
into other types of leave or benefits.
(4) A qualifying employee shall be authorized to use the thirty (30) day allotment of
paid maternity leave as a continuous:
(a) Thirty (30) day block; or
(b) Twenty (20) day block, with the remaining ten (10) days to be used:
1. As a separate continuous block; or
2. Intermittently, but taken as entire working days.
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 1/5/2026 9:13 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 182
(5) A qualifying employee shall request advance approval to use paid maternity leave.
If the employee cannot provide advance notice, she shall provide notice as soon
as practicable.
(6) Leave that qualifies as paid maternity leave shall be so designated and shall be
exhausted prior to the qualifying employee's use of other accrued leave. Upon
exhaustion of paid maternity leave, additional leave usage shall comply with the
other provisions of applicable law or policy, including the requirement for
medical documentation signed by a licensed medical provider certifying the
employee's continued need for leave.
(7) Paid maternity leave shall comply with the requirements of the Family and
Medical Leave Act of 1993, 29 U.S.C. sec. 2601 et seq., and the federal
regulations implementing the act, 29 C.F.R. pt. 825. Any leave entitlements
provided by the Family and Medical Leave Act that are not specifically listed in
this section shall not qualify for paid maternity leave.
(8) Upon separation from state service, a qualifying employee shall not be paid for
any unused paid maternity leave, and the unused balance of leave shall not be
converted to any other type of leave or benefits, including but not limited to
compensation, retirement benefits, or any other type of compensation or benefit
otherwise available to state employees.
Section 2. Any administrative regulations in conflict with Section 1 of this Act,
including but not limited to 101 KAR 2:102 and 101 KAR 3:015, shall be amended,
withdrawn, or repealed by the administrative body within 90 days of the effective date of
this Act for compliance.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 1/5/2026 9:13 AM Jacketed